Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB201.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "algorithmic device":
(a) Means a device that uses one (1) or more algorithms to perform
calculations of data, including data concerning local or statewide rent
amounts being charged to tenants by landlords, for the purpose of advising
a landlord concerning the amount of rent that the landlord may consider
charging a tenant;
(b) Includes a product that incorporates an algorithmic device; and
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 10/22/2025 11:27 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 831
(c) Does not include a product designed internally and used exclusively by a
landlord or a landlord's affiliates.
(2) A landlord shall not employ, use, or rely upon, or cause another person to
employ, use, or rely upon, an algorithmic device in setting the amount of rent to
be charged to a tenant for the occupancy of a dwelling unit.
(3) (a) A violation of this section shall be deemed an unfair, false, misleading, or
deceptive practice in the conduct of trade or commerce in violation of KRS
367.170 and an illegal restraint of trade or commerce in violation of KRS
367.175.
(b) All of the remedies, powers, and duties provided to the Attorney General by
the Consumer Protection Act, KRS 367.110 to 367.300, appertaining to acts
declared unlawful by KRS 367.170 and 367.175 shall apply with equal force
and effect to acts or practices declared unlawful under this section.
Section 2. Section 1 of this Act shall apply to a landlord's calculation of the
amount of rent for a rental agreement executed on or after the effective date of this Act.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 10/22/2025 11:27 AM Jacketed